Nebraska, session 109, LB400.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB400 LB400
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Firefighter includes both professional and volunteer
firefighters;
(b) Professional firefighter means a person who has been employed
for five or more years in this state in a full-time salaried occupation
as:
(i) A firefighter for the benefit or safety of the public;
(ii) An investigator of fires or arson; or
(iii) An instructor or officer for the provision of training
concerning fire or hazardous materials; and
(c) Volunteer firefighter means a person who has acted for five or
more years in this state as a volunteer firefighter described in
subdivision (3) of section 48-115.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act to the contrary, cancer that results in either temporary
or permanent disability or death is an occupational disease and
compensable as such under the act if:
(a) The cancer develops or manifests itself out of and in the course
of the employment of a firefighter; and
(b) It is demonstrated that:
(i) The firefighter was exposed, while in the course of employment,
to a known carcinogen or a substance reasonably anticipated to be a human
carcinogen, as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer
or the National Toxicology Program; and
(ii) Such carcinogen is reasonably associated with such cancer.
(3) With respect to a firefighter, the following substances shall be
deemed, for purposes of subsection (2) of this section, to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with the following cancers:
(a) Diesel exhaust, formaldehyde, and polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with bladder cancer;
-2-

LB400 LB400
2025 2025
(b) Acrylonitrile, formaldehyde, and vinyl chloride shall be deemed
to be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with brain cancer;
(c) Asbestos, benzene, diesel exhaust and soot, digoxin, ethylene
oxide, polychlorinated biphenyls, and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon
shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated
with breast cancer;
(d) Diesel exhaust and formaldehyde shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with colon cancer;
(e) Diesel exhaust and soot, formaldehyde, and polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with esophageal cancer;
(f) Formaldehyde shall be deemed to be a known carcinogen that is
reasonably associated with Hodgkin's lymphoma;
(g) Formaldehyde and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon shall be deemed
to be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with kidney
cancer;
(h) Benzene, diesel exhaust and soot, formaldehyde, 1,3-butadiene,
and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with leukemia;
(i) Chloroform, soot, and vinyl chloride shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with liver cancer;
(j) Arsenic, asbestos, cadmium, chromium compounds, oils, polycyclic
aromatic hydrocarbon, radon, silica, soot, and tars shall be deemed to be
known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with lung cancer;
(k) Acrylonitrile, benzene, formaldehyde, polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon, soot, and vinyl chloride shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with lymphatic or
haemotopoietic cancer;
(l) Diesel exhaust and soot, aldehydes, and polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with basal cell carcinoma, squamous cell carcinoma and
-3-

LB400 LB400
2025 2025
melanoma;
(m) Benzene, dioxins, and glyphosate shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with multiple myeloma;
(n) Arsenic, asbestos, benzene, diesel exhaust and soot,
formaldehyde, and hydrogen chloride shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with nasopharyngeal cancer,
including laryngeal cancer and pharyngeal cancer;
(o) Benzene, chronic hepatitis B and C viruses, formaldehyde, and
polychlorinated biphenyls shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that
are reasonably associated with non-Hodgkin's lymphoma;
(p) Asbestos, benzene, and formaldehyde shall be deemed to be known
carcinogens that are reasonably associated with ovarian cancer;
(q) Polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be a known
carcinogen that is reasonably associated with pancreatic cancer;
(r) Acrylonitrile, benzene, and formaldehyde shall be deemed to be
known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with prostate cancer;
(s) Diesel exhaust and soot, formaldehyde, and polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with rectal cancer;
(t) Chlorophenols, chlorophenoxy herbicides, and polychlorinated
biphenyls shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with soft tissue sarcoma;
(u) Diesel exhaust and soot, formaldehyde, and polycyclic aromatic
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with stomach cancer;
(v) Diesel exhaust and soot, and polychlorinated biphenyls shall be
deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with
testicular cancer;
(w) Diesel exhaust, benzene, and X-ray radiation shall be deemed to
be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with thyroid cancer;
(x) Diesel exhaust and soot, formaldehyde, and polycyclic aromatic
-4-

LB400 LB400
2025 2025
hydrocarbon shall be deemed to be known carcinogens that are reasonably
associated with urinary tract cancer and ureteral cancer; and
(y) Benzene and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon shall be deemed to
be known carcinogens that are reasonably associated with uterine cancer.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section is not an exhaustive list and
shall not preclude any person from demonstrating, on a case-by-case basis
for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section, that a substance is a
known carcinogen or is reasonably anticipated to be a human carcinogen,
including an agent classified by the International Agency for Research on
Cancer in Group 1 or Group 2A, that is reasonably associated with a
cancer.
(5) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a cancer
experienced by a firefighter arose out of and in the course of employment
if the cancer is diagnosed during the course of the firefighter's
employment.
(6)(a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption, for purposes of
subsection (2) of this section, that cancer experienced by a retired
firefighter arose out of and in the course of employment if the cancer is
diagnosed within a period, not to exceed sixty months, which begins with
the last date the retired firefighter actually worked in the qualifying
capacity and extends for a period calculated by multiplying three months
by the number of full years of such employment.
(b) This subsection applies to a professional firefighter who
retires before January 1, 2026, and to a volunteer firefighter,
regardless of the date of retirement.
(7) There shall be a rebuttable presumption, for purposes of
subsection (2) of this section, that cancer experienced by a professional
firefighter who retires on or after January 1, 2026, arose out of and in
the course of employment if such cancer was diagnosed:
(a) If the firefighter ceases employment before completing twenty
years of service as a professional firefighter, during the period after
-5-

LB400 LB400
2025 2025
separation from employment which is equal to the number of years worked;
or
(b) If the firefighter ceases employment after completing twenty
years or more of service as a professional firefighter, investigator, or
instructor, at any time during the person's life.
(8) Service credit which is purchased in a retirement system shall
not be used to calculate the number of years of service or employment for
purposes of this section.
(9) A person who files a claim for benefits for cancer pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section after retiring from employment as a
professional firefighter is not entitled to receive any compensation for
such cancer under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act other than
medical benefits.
Sec. 2. Section 48-1,110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1,110 Sections 48-101 to 48-1,117 and section 1 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 48-1,110, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-6-